District of Columbia statutes.
5-116.03

Evidentiary presumption.

Any statement of a person accused of a criminal offence in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia that is obtained in violation of § 5-116.01 shall be subject to the rebuttable presumption that it is involuntary. This presumption may be overcome if the prosecution proves by clear and convincing evidence that the statement was voluntarily given.

History

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-351, § 103, 52 DCR 2275